Massachusetts, session 194th, H5502.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 12B of chapter 76 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting, in line 216, after the word “sections” the following words:- ;
provided, however, that any municipal school district operating pursuant to a tuition agreement,
and not a regional school district agreement, for the provision of middle and high school
education, may exempt incoming school choice students at the elementary level from
participation in such tuition agreement.
of 1